Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 1 STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
33-136. Suicide prevention in schools.

The state board of education shall adopt rules supporting suicide awareness and prevention training each year for public school personnel. This training may be provided within the framework of existing in-service training programs offered by the state board of education and the state department of education or as part of professional development activities.

The state board of education and state department of education shall, in consultation with the state department of health and welfare, education and health care stakeholders, and suicide prevention experts, develop a list of approved training materials to fulfill the requirements of this section.
(2)(a) The state board of education and state department of education shall, in consultation with the state department of health and welfare, education and health care stakeholders, and suicide prevention experts, develop a list of approved training materials to fulfill the requirements of this section.

Approved materials shall include training on how to identify appropriate mental health services, both within the school and the larger community, and when and how to refer youth and their families to those services.

Approved materials may include programs that can be completed through self-review of suitable suicide prevention materials.

Each public school district shall adopt a policy on student suicide prevention. Such policy shall, at a minimum, address procedures relating to suicide prevention, intervention and postvention. As used in this paragraph, “postvention” means counseling or other social care given to students after another student’s suicide or attempted suicide.
(3)(a) Each public school district shall adopt a policy on student suicide prevention. Such policy shall, at a minimum, address procedures relating to suicide prevention, intervention and postvention. As used in this paragraph, “postvention” means counseling or other social care given to students after another student’s suicide or attempted suicide.

To assist school districts in developing policies for student suicide prevention, the state department of education shall develop and maintain a model policy, or adopt an existing policy as a model policy, to serve as a guide for school districts in accordance with this section.

No person shall have a cause of action for any loss or damage caused by any act or omission resulting from the implementation of the provisions of this section or resulting from any training required by this section, or lack thereof.
(4)(a) No person shall have a cause of action for any loss or damage caused by any act or omission resulting from the implementation of the provisions of this section or resulting from any training required by this section, or lack thereof.

The training required by the provisions of this section, or lack thereof, shall not be construed to impose any specific duty of care.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to conflict with the provisions of section 33-512B, Idaho Code.

33-137. Digital and online library resources for K-12 students.

A school district or public charter school may offer digital or online library resources to students in kindergarten through grade 12 only if the vendor or other person or entity providing the resources verifies that all the resources will comply with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section.

Digital or online library resources offered by school districts or public charter schools to students in kindergarten through grade 12 must have safety policies and technology protection measures that:

Prohibit and prevent a user of the resource from sending, receiving, viewing, or downloading materials that are deemed to be harmful to minors, as defined by section 18-1514, Idaho Code; and

Filter or block access to obscene materials, materials harmful to minors, and materials that depict the sexual exploitation of a minor, as defined in chapter 15, title 18, Idaho Code.

Notwithstanding any contract provision to the contrary, if a provider of digital or online library resources fails to comply with the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, the school district or public charter school may withhold further payments, if any, to the provider pending verification of compliance with that subsection.

If a provider of digital or online library resources fails to timely verify that the provider is in compliance with the requirements of subsection (1) [(2)] of this section, the school district or public charter school may consider the provider’s act of noncompliance a breach of contract.

No later than December 1 of each year, the Idaho commission for libraries shall submit to the governor and the senate and house of representatives education committees an aggregate written report on any issues related to provider compliance with technology protection measures required by subsection (2) of this section.